Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.52
Original capitol furniture; returned to State Capitol.

All agencies, boards, and commissions are directed to return all original capitol furniture to the State Capitol upon written notice by the State Capitol Administrator. Such furniture shall be surplused to the Office of the Nebraska Capitol Commission at no cost.

Laws 1980, LB 885, § 5;

Laws 2004, LB 439, § 29.